Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4406
Premiums; taxable.

All premiums paid for coverage within this state to risk retention groups shall be subject to taxation at the same rate and subject to the same interest, fines, and penalties for nonpayment as that applicable to foreign admitted insurers, and it shall be the responsibility of each risk retention group to report and pay such taxes whether or not the group is licensed as an insurance company in this state and whether or not agents or brokers are utilized.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 6.